Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201553-103.44
Hard cider, defined.

Hard cider means still wine (1)(a)(i) derived primarily from apples or apple concentrate and water such that apple juice, or the equivalent amount of concentrate reconstituted to the original brix of the juice prior to concentration, represents more than fifty percent of the volume of the finished product and (ii) containing no other fruit product nor any artificial product which imparts a fruit flavor other than apple or (b)(i) derived primarily from pears or pear concentrate and water such that pear juice, or the equivalent amount of concentrate reconstituted to the original brix of the juice prior to concentration, represents more than fifty percent of the volume of the finished product and (ii) containing no other fruit product nor any artificial product which imparts a fruit flavor other than pear, (2) containing at least one-half of one percent and less than eight and one-half percent alcohol by volume, (3) having the taste, aroma, and characteristics generally attributed to hard cider, and (4) sold or offered for sale as hard cider.

Laws 2015, LB330, § 5.
July 1, 2015